Connecticut, session 2026, HB05511.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 19a-2a of the 2026 supplement to the general
statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective October 1, 2026):
The Commissioner of Public Health shall employ the most efficient
and practical means for the prevention and suppression of disease and
shall administer all laws under the jurisdiction of the Department of
Public Health and the Public Health Code. The commissioner shall have
responsibility for the overall operation and administration of the
Department of Public Health. The commissioner shall have the power
and duty to: (1) Administer, coordinate and direct the operation of the
department; (2) adopt and enforce regulations, in accordance with
chapter 54, as are necessary to carry out the purposes of the department
as established by statute; (3) establish rules for the internal operation
and administration of the department; (4) establish and develop
programs and administer services to achieve the purposes of the
department as established by statute; (5) enter into a contract, including,
but not limited to, a contract with another state, for facilities, services
and programs to implement the purposes of the department as
established by statute; (6) designate a deputy commissioner or other
LCO 1 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5511
employee of the department to sign any license, certificate or permit
issued by said department; (7) conduct a hearing, issue subpoenas,
administer oaths, compel testimony and render a final decision in any
case when a hearing is required or authorized under the provisions of
any statute dealing with the Department of Public Health; (8) with the
health authorities of this and other states, secure information and data
concerning the prevention and control of epidemics and conditions
affecting or endangering the public health, and compile such
information and statistics and shall disseminate among health
authorities and the people of the state such information as may be of
value to them; (9) annually issue a list of reportable diseases, emergency
illnesses and health conditions and a list of reportable laboratory
findings and amend such lists as the commissioner deems necessary and
distribute such lists as well as any necessary forms to each licensed
physician, licensed physician assistant, licensed advanced practice
registered nurse and clinical laboratory in this state. The commissioner
shall prepare printed forms for reports and returns, with such
instructions as may be necessary, for the use of directors of health,
boards of health and registrars of vital statistics; and (10) specify
uniform methods of keeping statistical information by public and
private agencies, organizations and individuals, including a client
identifier system, and collect and make available relevant statistical
information, including the number of persons treated, frequency of
admission and readmission, and frequency and duration of treatment.
In the administration or enforcement of any applicable statute,
regulation, permit or order, the department may resolve any dispute
regarding compliance by agreed settlement or consent order. The client
identifier system shall be subject to the confidentiality requirements set
forth in section 17a-688 and regulations adopted thereunder. The
commissioner may designate any person to perform any of the duties
listed in subdivision (7) of this section. The commissioner shall have
authority over directors of health and may, for cause, remove any such
director; but any person claiming to be aggrieved by such removal may
appeal to the Superior Court which may affirm or reverse the action of
the commissioner as the public interest requires. The commissioner shall
LCO 2 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5511
assist and advise local directors of health and district directors of health
in the performance of their duties, and may require the enforcement of
any law, regulation or ordinance relating to public health. In the event
the commissioner reasonably suspects impropriety on the part of a local
director of health or district director of health, or employee of such
director, in the performance of his or her duties, the commissioner shall
provide notification and any evidence of such impropriety to the
appropriate governing authority of the municipal health authority,
established pursuant to section 19a-200, or the district department of
health, established pursuant to section 19a-244, for purposes of
reviewing and assessing a director's or an employee's compliance with
such duties. Such governing authority shall provide a written report of
its findings from the review and assessment to the commissioner not
later than ninety days after such review and assessment. When
requested by local directors of health or district directors of health, the
commissioner shall consult with them and investigate and advise
concerning any condition affecting public health within their
jurisdiction. The commissioner shall investigate nuisances and
conditions affecting, or that he or she has reason to suspect may affect,
the security of life and health in any locality and, for that purpose, the
commissioner, or any person authorized by the commissioner, may
enter and examine any ground, vehicle, apartment, building or place,
and any person designated by the commissioner shall have the
authority conferred by law upon constables. Whenever the
commissioner determines that any provision of the general statutes or
regulation of the Public Health Code is not being enforced effectively by
a local health department or health district, he or she shall forthwith take
such measures, including the performance of any act required of the
local health department or health district, to ensure enforcement of such
statute or regulation and shall inform the local health department or
health district of such measures. In September of each year the
commissioner shall certify to the Secretary of the Office of Policy and
Management the population of each municipality. The commissioner
may solicit and accept for use any gift of money or property made by
will or otherwise, and any grant of or contract for money, services or
LCO 3 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5511
property from the federal government, the state, any political
subdivision thereof, any other state or any private source, and do all
things necessary to cooperate with the federal government or any of its
agencies in making an application for any grant or contract. The
commissioner may enter into any contracts or agreements, in
accordance with any established procedures, as may be necessary for
the distribution or use of such money, services or property in
accordance with any requirements to fulfill any conditions of a gift,
grant or contract. The commissioner may establish state-wide and
regional advisory councils. For purposes of this section, "employee of
100 such director" means an employee of, a consultant employed or retained
101 by or an independent contractor retained by a local director of health, a
102 district director of health, a local health department or a health district.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 19a-2a
PH Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 4 of 4